Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1362.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; resilience plan The sum of $2,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona, Aegis consortium for the preparation of a state resilience plan.